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1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE ENGINE (RM617E)

DTC 19 (3) Accelerator Pedal Closed Position Switch
Circuit Malfunction (Short)

DTC 19 (4) Accelerator Pedal Closed Position Switch
Circuit Malfunction (Open)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Refer to DTC 19 (1) (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Open/Short)) on page DI−27.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

19(3)

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue 0.5 sec. or more:
(a) PDL ON
(b) VA > Fully closed study voltage +0.41 V
(c) VAS > Fully closed study voltage +0.41 V

S Short in accelerator pedal closed position switch circuit
S Accelerator pedal closed position switch
S Engine ECU

PDL does not turn ON even once while driving vehicle
(2 trip detection logic) S Open in accelerator pedal closed position switch circuit

19(4) Conditions (a) and (b) continue 5 sec. or more:
(a) PDL OFF
(b) IDL ON

S Open in accelerator pedal closed position switch circuit
S Accelerator pedal closed position switch
S Engine ECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

Refer to DTC 19 (1) (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Open/Short)) on page DI−27.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check accelerator pedal closed position switch.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the accelerator pedal closed position switch con-
nector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals of accelerator pedal
closed position switch.
OK:

Terminals Accelerator pedal Resistance

1 − 2 Fully closed �

1 − 2 Fully open 0 − 20 �

NG Replace accelerator pedal closed position
switch (See page ED−9) .

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal PDL of engine ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal PDL of engine ECU and
body ground.
OK:

Accelerator pedal Voltage

Fully closed 9 − 14 V

Fully open 0 − 3 V

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and accelerator pedal
closed position switch and body ground (See page IN−1 9) .


